Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.496

Transfers of budget stabilization account deposits to the general fund.

(1) By June 30, 2015, the treasurer shall transfer into the state general fund the entire budget stabilization account deposit for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium that is attributable to extraordinary revenue growth, not to exceed fifty million dollars.

(2) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the treasurer shall transfer into the state general fund the entire budget stabilization account deposit for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium that is attributable to extraordinary revenue growth, not to exceed one billion seventy-eight million dollars.

(3) For purposes of RCW 43.88.055(4), the transfers in this section do not alter the requirement to balance in ensuing biennia.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 29 s 5; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 29: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [July 7, 2017]." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 29 s 6.]

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 2: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [June 30, 2015]." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 2 s 2.]